Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAWNS TO LUNCH PILOT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for a lawns to lunch pilot program to provide financial and technical assistance to plant residential landscapes and community spaces with food gardens, including: new text end new text begin (1) vegetables; new text end new text begin (2) fruits, including fruit trees; new text end new text begin (3) other foods; and new text end new text begin (4) flowering plants necessary to facilitate pollination of the vegetables, fruits, or other food plantings. new text end new text begin (b) The board may enter into agreements with local governments, the University of Minnesota Extension Master Gardener volunteer program, and nonprofit organizations to support this effort. new text end new text begin (c) Money appropriated in this section must not be used for: new text end new text begin (1) greenhouses or other buildings; or new text end new text begin (2) planting food for sale or for another commercial use. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2030. new text end